hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip ribolovne role: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konvencionalno / iznad glave (overhead); Električno; Za mušičarenje; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Za panulavanje (trolling); Ostalo
es: Tipo de carrete de pesca compatible: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Convencional/tambor giratorio; Eléctrico; Mosca; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Curricán; Otro
vi: Loại máy câu tương thích: Máy ngang (Baitcasting); Máy centerpin; Máy câu biển (Conventional/overhead); Máy điện; Máy câu ruồi (Fly); Máy mooching; Máy spincast; Máy dọc (Spinning); Máy triggerspin; Máy câu kéo (Trolling); Khác
bg-BG: Съвместим тип макара за риболов: Бейткаст; Центърпин; Конвенционална/мултипликатор; Електрическа; Мухарска; Мучинг; Спинкаст; Спининг; Тригърспин; За тролинг; Други
sk-SK: Typ kompatibilného rybárskeho navijaka: Baitcastový; Centerpin; Konvenčný/multiplikátor; Elektrický; Muškársky; Moochingový; Spincastový; Prívlačový; Triggerspin; Trollingový; Iné
ja: 互換性のある釣りリールタイプ: ベイトキャスティング; センターピン; 両軸 / オーバーヘッド; 電動; フライ; ムーチング; スピンキャスト; スピニング; トリガースピン; トローリング; その他
ko: 호환되는 낚시 릴 종류: 베이트캐스팅; 센터핀; 컨벤셔널/오버헤드; 전동; 플라이; 무칭; 스핀캐스트; 스피닝; 트리거스핀; 트롤링; 기타
el: Συμβατός τύπος μηχανισμού ψαρέματος: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Συμβατικό/overhead; Ηλεκτρικό; Fly; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Άλλο
da: Kompatibel fiskehjulstype: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konventionel/overhead; Elektrisk; Flue; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de carreto de pesca compatível: Carreto de casting; Carreto de eixo central; Convencional/de tambor rotativo; Elétrico; Carreto de pesca à mosca; Carreto de mooching; Carreto de spincast; Carreto de spinning; Carreto de triggerspin; Carreto de corrico; Outro
th: ประเภทรอกตกปลาที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เบทคาสติง; เซ็นเตอร์พิน; ทั่วไป/โอเวอร์เฮด; รอกไฟฟ้า; ฟลาย; มูชชิง; สปินคาสต์; สปินนิง; ทริกเกอร์สปิน; ทรอลลิง; อื่นๆ
ru: Совместимый тип рыболовной катушки: Бейткастинговые; Центрпин; Классические мультипликаторные; Электрические; Нахлыстовые; Мучинговые; Закрытые безынерционные; Безынерционные; Закрытые безынерционные (триггерные); Троллинговые; Другое
tr: Uyumlu olta makarası tipi: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Geleneksel/overhead; Elektrikli; Fly; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Diğer
nl: Compatibel vismolentype: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Conventioneel/overhead; Elektrisch; Vlieg; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Overig
de: Kompatibler Angelrollentyp: Baitcaster; Centerpin; Multirolle; Elektrorolle; Fliegenrolle; Mooching-Rolle; Kapselrolle; Stationärrolle; Triggerspin; Schlepprolle; Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel fiskerulletyp: Multirulle; Centerpin; Traditionell/havsfiskerulle; Elektrisk; Flugrulle; Mooching-rulle; Inkapslad spinnrulle; Haspelrulle; Triggerspin; Trollingrulle; Annat
fi: Yhteensopiva kalastuskelatyyppi: Hyrräkela; Centerpin; Perinteinen/hyrräkela; Sähkökela; Perhokela; Mooching; Umpikela; Avokela; Alapuolinen umpikela; Vetouistelukela; Muu
it: Tipo di mulinello da pesca compatibile: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Tradizionale/a bobina rotante; Elettrico; A mosca; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Traina; Altro
sl-SI: Združljiv tip ribiškega koluta: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Klasično/overhead; Električno; Muharsko; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Panuliranje; Drugo
en: Compatible fishing reel type: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Conventional/overhead; Electric; Fly; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Other
nb: Kompatibel fiskesnelletype: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Tradisjonell / havfiske; Elektrisk; Flue; Mooching; Lukket haspel; Haspel; Triggerspin; Trolling; Annet
zh-TW: 相容的釣魚捲線器類型: 擬餌拋投捲線器 / 雙軸捲線器; 中心軸捲線器; 傳統/鼓式捲線器; 電動捲線器; 飛蠅捲線器; Mooching 捲線器; 封閉式捲線器; 紡車式捲線器; 扳機式封閉捲線器; 拖釣捲線器; 其他
zh-CN: 适配的渔线轮类型: 水滴轮; 中心轴渔轮; 传统/鼓式渔轮; 电动渔轮; 飞蝇轮; 穆钦轮; 封闭式纺车轮; 纺车轮; 扳机式封闭轮; 拖钓轮; 其他
pl: Kompatybilny typ kołowrotka wędkarskiego: Baitcastingowy; Z ruchomą szpulą (centerpin); Konwencjonalny/morski; Elektryczny; Mucharowy; Moochingowy; Z zamkniętą szpulą (spincast); Spinningowy; Triggerspin; Trollingowy; Inne
lt-LT: Suderinamas žvejybos ritės tipas: „Baitcasting“ tipo; Inercinė („Centerpin“); Klasikinė / būgninė; Elektrinė; Muselinė; „Mooching“ tipo; Uždaro būgnelio („Spincast“); Spiningo; „Triggerspin“ tipo; Velkiavimo; Kita
fr: Type de moulinet de pêche compatible: Lancer lourd; À broche centrale; Conventionnel / à tambour tournant; Électrique; Mouche; Pêche à la traîne (mooching); Lancer fermé; Lancer léger; Lancer à gâchette; Traîne; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de carretel de pesca compatível: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Carretilha de perfil alto/convencional; Elétrica; Fly; Mooching; Spincast; Molinete; Triggerspin; Corrico; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de mulinetă de pescuit compatibilă: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Convențională/overhead; Electrică; Pescuit la muscă; Mooching; Spincast; Spinning; Triggerspin; Trolling; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis horgászorsó-típus: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Hagyományos (multiplikátoros); Elektromos; Légyező; Mooching; Zárt dobos (spincast); Peremfutó; Triggerspin; Trolling; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní typ rybářského navijáku: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konvenční/multiplikátor; Elektrické; Muškařské; Mooching; Spincast; Přívlačové; Triggerspin; Trollingové; Jiné